Maine, session 132, LD1815.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2401, sub-§12-A is enacted to read:
12-A. THC level. "THC level" means the amount, in nanograms, of
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol per milliliter of blood.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2522-A is enacted to read:
§2522-A. Accidents; mandatory testing
1. Mandatory submission to test. If there is probable cause to believe that death or
serious bodily injury, as defined in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 23, has occurred or
will occur as a result of a motor vehicle accident and that the operator of a motor vehicle
involved in the accident is under the influence of drugs, the operator shall submit to a blood
test pursuant to section 2524 to determine the operator's THC level or the presence of
another drug or drug metabolite.
2. Administration of test. The investigating law enforcement officer shall cause a
blood test to be administered to the operator of the motor vehicle as soon as practicable
following the accident under subsection 1. The operator shall submit to and complete the
test administered. Testing must be conducted in accordance with section 2521.
3. Admissibility of test results. The result of a test under this section is admissible at
trial if the court, after reviewing all the evidence, whether gathered prior to, during or after
the test, is satisfied that probable cause exists, independent of the test result, to believe that
the operator was under the influence of drugs at the time of the accident.
4. Suspension. The Secretary of State shall suspend for a period of one year the license
of a person who fails to submit to a test under this section.
5. Scope of hearing. The scope of any hearing the Secretary of State holds pursuant
to section 2483 must include whether there was probable cause to believe that the person
was the operator of a motor vehicle involved in a motor vehicle accident in which a death
or serious bodily injury, as defined in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 23, had occurred or
would occur and whether the person failed to submit to and complete the test required under
this section. If the person shows, after hearing, that the person was not under the influence
of drugs or that the person did not negligently cause the accident, the suspension must be
immediately removed.